California, session 20252026, AB1357.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 15.5 (commencing with Section 18996.5) is added to Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: CHAPTER 15.5. Guaranteed Income Payments18996.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, guaranteed income payments received by an individual shall not be considered income or resources for purposes of determining eligibility for benefits, or the amount of benefits, under any means-tested program, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(1) The California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) program, as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3.(2) The CalFresh program, as described in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900).(3) The California Food Assistance Program (CFAP), as described in Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930), through whichever version of Section 18930 is operative.(4) The Medi-Cal program, as described in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3.(5) The General Assistance Program, as described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 5.(6)The Kinship Guardianship Assistance Payment (Kin-GAP) Program, as described in Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) of Chapter 2 of Part 3.(7)The Adoption Assistance Program (AAP), as described in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4.(8)(6) The Cash Assistance Program for Immigrants (CAPI), as described in Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 18937).(b) Notwithstanding any other law, benefits received by an individual under any means-tested program, including, but not limited to, those listed in subdivision (a), shall not be considered income or resources for purposes of determining eligibility for guaranteed income payments or the amount of those guaranteed income payments.(c) For purposes of this section, “guaranteed income payments” means unconditional, recurring, regular cash payments, whether publicly or privately funded, that are intended to support the basic needs of eligible recipients, including, but not limited to, payments provided through pilot programs or projects receiving funding from the California Guaranteed Income Pilot Program (Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 18997)) or payments provided through locally funded programs.(d) For purposes of the California Guaranteed Income Pilot Program, this section shall be implemented in conjunction with subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 18997.(e) This section shall be implemented only to the extent not in conflict with federal law.(f) The State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Health Care Services shall, for programs under their jurisdiction, seek any federal waivers necessary to implement this section.SEC. 2. No appropriation pursuant to Section 15200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be made for purposes of this act.SEC. 3. To the extent that this act has an overall effect of increasing certain costs already borne by a local agency for programs or levels of service mandated by the 2011 Realignment Legislation within the meaning of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, it shall apply to local agencies only to the extent that the state provides annual funding for the cost increase. Any new program or higher level of service provided by a local agency pursuant to this act above the level for which funding has been provided shall not require a subvention of funds by the state or otherwise be subject to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.